New York, session 2025-2026, A11370.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 209 of the civil service law, as 2 amended by section 64 of subpart B of part C of chapter 62 of the laws 3 of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 4 2. Public employers are hereby empowered to enter into written agree- 5 ments with recognized or certified employee organizations setting forth 6 procedures to be invoked in the event of disputes which reach an impasse 7 in the course of collective negotiations. Such agreements may include 8 the undertaking by each party to submit unresolved issues to impartial 9 arbitration. In the absence or upon the failure of such procedures, 10 public employers and employee organizations may request the board to 11 render assistance as provided in this section, or the board may render 12 such assistance on its own motion, as provided in subdivision three of 13 this section, or, in regard to officers or members of any organized fire 14 department, or any unit of the public employer which previously was a 15 part of an organized fire department whose primary mission includes the 16 prevention and control of aircraft fires, police force or police depart- 17 ment of any county, city, town, village or fire or police district, or 18 detective-investigators, or rackets investigators employed in the office 19 of a district attorney of a county, or in regard to any organized unit 20 of troopers, commissioned or noncommissioned officers of the division of 21 state police, or in regard to investigators, senior investigators and 22 investigator specialists of the division of state police, or in regard 23 to members of collective negotiating units designated as security 24 services and security supervisors who are police officers, who are 25 forest ranger captains or who are employed by the state department of 26 corrections and community supervision and are designated as peace offi- 27 cers pursuant to subdivision twenty-five of section 2.10 of the criminal 28 procedure law, or in regard to members of the collective negotiating EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15796-01-6 A. 11370 2 1 unit designated as the agency law enforcement services unit who are 2 police officers pursuant to subdivision thirty-four of section 1.20 of 3 the criminal procedure law or who are forest rangers, or in regard to 4 organized units of deputy sheriffs who are engaged directly in criminal 5 law enforcement activities that aggregate more than fifty per centum of 6 their service as certified by the county sheriff and are police officers 7 pursuant to subdivision thirty-four of section 1.20 of the criminal 8 procedure law as certified by the municipal police training council or 9 Suffolk county correction officers or Suffolk county park police, or in 10 regard to a bargaining unit in any village in Rockland county with an 11 agreement that has been expired for at least seven years, as provided in 12 subdivision four of this section. 13 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 209 of the civil service law, as amended 14 by chapter 234 of the laws of 2008, is amended to read as follows: 15 2. Public employers are hereby empowered to enter into written agree- 16 ments with recognized or certified employee organizations setting forth 17 procedures to be invoked in the event of disputes which reach an impasse 18 in the course of collective negotiations. Such agreements may include 19 the undertaking by each party to submit unresolved issues to impartial 20 arbitration. In the absence or upon the failure of such procedures, 21 public employers and employee organizations may request the board to 22 render assistance as provided in this section, or the board may render 23 such assistance on its own motion, as provided in subdivision three of 24 this section, or, in regard to officers or members of any organized fire 25 department, or any unit of the public employer which previously was a 26 part of an organized fire department whose primary mission includes the 27 prevention and control of aircraft fires, police force or police depart- 28 ment of any county, city, except the city of New York, town, village or 29 fire or police district, or in regard to organized units of deputy sher- 30 iffs who are engaged directly in criminal law enforcement activities 31 that aggregate more than fifty per centum of their service as certified 32 by the county sheriff and are police officers pursuant to subdivision 33 thirty-four of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law as certified 34 by the municipal police training council or Suffolk county correction 35 officers or Suffolk county park police, or in regard to a bargaining 36 unit in any village in Rockland county with an agreement that has been 37 expired for at least seven years, as provided in subdivision four of 38 this section. 39 § 3. The opening paragraph of subdivision 4 of section 209 of the 40 civil service law, as amended by section 64 of subpart B of part C of 41 chapter 62 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 42 On request of either party or upon its own motion, as provided in 43 subdivision two of this section, and in the event the board determines 44 that an impasse exists in collective negotiations between such employee 45 organization and a public employer as to the conditions of employment of 46 officers or members of any organized fire department, or any other unit 47 of the public employer which previously was a part of an organized fire 48 department whose primary mission includes the prevention and control of 49 aircraft fires, police force or police department of any county, city, 50 town, village or fire or police district, and detective-investigators, 51 criminal investigators or rackets investigators employed in the office 52 of a district attorney, or as to the conditions of employment of members 53 of any organized unit of troopers, commissioned or noncommissioned offi- 54 cers of the division of state police or as to the conditions of employ- 55 ment of members of any organized unit of investigators, senior investi- 56 gators and investigator specialists of the division of state police, or A. 11370 3 1 as to the terms and conditions of employment of members of collective 2 negotiating units designated as security services and security supervi- 3 sors, who are police officers, who are forest ranger captains or who are 4 employed by the state department of corrections and community super- 5 vision and are designated as peace officers pursuant to subdivision 6 twenty-five of section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law, or in regard 7 to members of the collective negotiating unit designated as the agency 8 law enforcement services unit who are police officers pursuant to subdi- 9 vision thirty-four of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law or who 10 are forest rangers, or as to the conditions of employment of any organ- 11 ized unit of deputy sheriffs who are engaged directly in criminal law 12 enforcement activities that aggregate more than fifty per centum of 13 their service as certified by the county sheriff and are police officers 14 pursuant to subdivision thirty-four of section 1.20 of the criminal 15 procedure law as certified by the municipal police training council or 16 Suffolk county correction officers or Suffolk county park police, or a 17 bargaining unit in any village in Rockland county with an agreement that 18 has been expired for at least seven years, the board shall render 19 assistance as follows: 20 § 4. Subdivision 4 of section 209 of the civil service law is amended 21 by adding a new paragraph (j) to read as follows: 22 (j) With regard to a village in Rockland county with an agreement that 23 has been expired for at least seven years, notwithstanding subparagraph 24 (vi) of paragraph (c) of this subdivision, the arbitration panel shall 25 have no restriction in issuing an award for the term of an agreement 26 regarding both retroactive and prospective years under such award. 27 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 28 the amendments to subdivision 2 of section 209 of the civil service law 29 made by section one of this act shall be subject to the expiration and 30 reversion of such subdivision when upon such date the provisions of 31 section two of this act shall take effect; and provided further, however 32 that the amendments to subdivision 4 of section 209 of the civil service 33 law made by sections three and four of this act shall be subject to the 34 expiration of such subdivision and shall be deemed to expire therewith.